Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB441.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 13A62(b)(3) of Title 4 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 13A62. Table game taxes.* * *(b) Deposits and distributions.--* * *(3) [The] Notwithstanding section 2502.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, or any other provision of law, the tax imposed under subsection (a) shall be deposited into the [General Fund] Property Tax Relief Fund.Section 2. Repeals are as follows:(1) The General Assembly declares that the repeal under 123456789101112131415161718 paragraph (2) is necessary to effectuate the amendment of 4 Pa.C.S. § 13A62(b)(3).(2) Section 2502.1 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is repealed insofar as it is inconsistent with the amendment of 4 Pa.C.S. § 13A62(b)(3).Section 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0441PN0371 - 2 - 1234567